Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 5

Accounting System and Reports

5-8-501. Standard accounting system.

The comptroller of the treasury, with the approval of the governor, shall devise a modern and effective bookkeeping and accounting system to be used by all county officials and agencies receiving and disbursing the revenues of the state or any political subdivision thereof, and shall prescribe the minimum standards that shall be required under such system.

Acts 1953, ch. 25, § 1 (Williams, § 1681.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-825.

Cross-References. Administration by comptroller of the treasury, § 4-3-305.

Attorney General Opinions. Inmate funds are required to be handled by the sheriff consistent with the standards established by the state comptroller's county audit division, OAG 06-156, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (10/9/06).

5-8-502. Compliance with accounting standards.

All county officials and agencies receiving and disbursing the revenues of the state or any political subdivision thereof shall be required to adopt a system of bookkeeping and accounting that meets the minimum standards provided for in § 5-8-501.

Acts 1953, ch. 25, § 2 (Williams, § 1681.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-826.

Attorney General Opinions. Inmate funds are required to be handled by the sheriff consistent with the standards established by the state comptroller's county audit division, OAG 06-156, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (10/9/06).

5-8-503. Noncompliance — Additional audit costs.

If any county official or agency receiving and disbursing the revenues of the state or any political subdivision thereof shall fail to comply with § 5-8-502, the county, within thirty (30) days after the completion of the audit made by the state department of audit under §§ 4-3-304 and 9-3-212, shall be obligated to pay into the office of the comptroller of the treasury such portion of the actual cost of the audit as exceeds the fee provided by § 9-3-210.

Acts 1953, ch. 25, § 3 (Williams, § 1681.3); impl. am. Acts 1977, ch. 103, §§ 2, 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-827.

5-8-504. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-8-504 (Acts 1953, ch. 25, § 4 (Williams, § 1681.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-828), concerning reduced audit costs to encourage counties to comply with accounting standards, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 179, § 13, effective July 1, 1995.

5-8-505. Financial reports — Applicability and contents.

All appointive or elective county public officials, official county boards, committees and commissions in the state having in their charge and custody public funds or moneys are required to file with the county mayor and with the county clerk, who shall provide a copy of this report to each member of the county legislative body on or before the next meeting of the county legislative body an annual financial report for the year ended June 30, in a form prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1947, ch. 215, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1653.1 (Williams, § 1652); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-829; Acts 1991, ch. 484, § 1; 1993, ch. 315, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-8-506. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-8-506 (Acts 1947, ch. 215, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1653.1 (Williams, § 1652); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-830), concerning publication of financial reports, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 484, § 2, effective January 1, 1992.

5-8-507. Annual operating budget — Publication — Budgetary comparison.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the county commission shall cause to be published the proposed annual operating budget, no later than five (5) days after the budget is presented to the governing body, in a newspaper of general circulation, if the newspaper is published daily. If the newspaper of general circulation is published less frequently than daily, then the commission shall cause the proposed annual operating budget to be published in the first edition for which the deadline for publication falls after the budget is presented to the governing body. No county commission shall approve final adoption of such budget until at least ten (10) days after the budget has been so published. A county may also publish the proposed annual operating budget on the county's Internet web site, which shall be accessible to the public, on the day the budget is presented to the governing body in order to give the public notice of the budget.

The annual operating budget shall contain a budgetary comparison for the following governmental funds:

General;

Highway/public works;

General purpose school fund; and

Debt service.

The budgetary comparison shall include comparisons of the proposed budget with the current year and the prior year. The budgetary comparisons shall be by individual fund and shall summarize revenues by local taxes, state of Tennessee, federal government and other sources. Expenditures shall be summarized by salaries and other costs. The budgetary comparison shall also present beginning and ending fund balances and the number of employee positions.

Acts 1991, ch. 484, § 4; 1992, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 732, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 379, § 1.